test/src/morphology/V-luqggw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - luʼggõ: # Verb 'to read' - full paradigm
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Inf: luʼggõ
     lu’ggõ+V+Ger: lu’ggõs
     lu’ggõ+V+Sup: lu’ggõm
     lu’ggõ+V+Sup+Ine: lu’ggõmõs
     lu’ggõ+V+Sup+Ela: lu’ggõmõst
     lu’ggõ+V+Sup+Tra: lu’ggõmõks
     lu’ggõ+V+Sup+Abe: lu’ggõmõt

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lugūb
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lugūd
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lugūb
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luʼggõm
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luʼggõt
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [luʼggõbõd, lugūbõd]

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: luʼg
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: luʼggõm
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: luʼggõt
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: luʼggõt

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lugīz
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lugīzt
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lugīz
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lugīzmõ
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lugīzt, lugīztõ]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [lugīzt, lugīztõ]

     
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+Prs+Sg2: luʼg
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+Prs+Pl1: luʼggõgõm
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+Prs+Pl2: luʼggõgid
     lu’ggõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: lu’g


     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Sg1: [lugūks, lu’ggõks]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Sg2: lugūkst
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Sg3: lugūks
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl1: lugūksmõ
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl2: lugūkstõ
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: lugūkstõ
     
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Jus+Prs+Sg: luʼggõg
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Jus+Prs+Pl: luʼggõgõd

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Quo+Prs+Sg: luʼggiji
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Quo+Prs+Pl: luʼggijid

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Act+PrsPrc+Sg: luʼggõb     
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Act+PrsPrc+Pl: luʼggõbõd
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: luʼggõn
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: luʼggõnd

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: luʼgdõb
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl: luʼgdõbõd
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: luʼgdõd

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ger+Ine: luʼggõs
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Ill: luʼggõm
     
     
#
     vakțõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: vakț
     kittõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kit
     riʼddõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: riʼd
     kutsõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kuts
     laskõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: lask
     akkõ+V+IV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ak

#luʼggõ+V+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: lugdõd
     vakțõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: vakțõd
     kittõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: kittõd
     riʼddõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: riʼdtõd
     kutsõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: kutstõd
     laskõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: lastõd
     akkõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: aktõd
